
	Marathon - Home













HomeAbout UsPhilosophyKey PeopleStewardshipStrategiesGlobal EquityInternational EquityInternational (ACWI ex US) EquityEuropean EquityUK EquityJapanese EquityPacific Basin EquityEmerging Markets Equity FundFund PricesGlobal Investment ReviewGIR LibraryContact UsCareersContact Us FormClient AreaWelcome to MarathonMarathon Asset Management LLP is an independent investment management company based in the West End of London. Marathon manages equities for a globally diverse client base comprising a broad range of institutional investors.

					 

				
Login






Please enter your email address



Email Address:








Please enter your password



Password:







Lost your password?
Register











Print this page© 2016 Marathon Asset ManagementIssued in the UK by Marathon Asset Management LLP, which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.Site MapLegal Notice
	Marathon - Disclaimer







HomeAbout UsPhilosophyKey PeopleStewardshipStrategiesGlobal EquityInternational EquityInternational (ACWI ex US) EquityEuropean EquityUK EquityJapanese EquityPacific Basin EquityEmerging Markets Equity FundFund PricesGlobal Investment ReviewGIR LibraryContact UsCareersContact Us FormClient Area DisclaimerPLEASE READ THE REGULATORY INFORMATION AND TERMS OF USE CAREFULLY BEFORE YOU USE THIS WEBSITEMarathon Asset Management LLP ( "Marathon") provides access to, operates and issues the www.marathon.co.uk website (the "Website") subject to the terms and conditions of use (the "terms of use")set out on this page.In using the Website, you agree to the terms of use, including Marathon’s use of cookies on this Website, and the terms of the Privacy and Cookies Policy. If you do not accept any of them you should exit the Website now. Marathon reserves the right to change these terms of use from time to time and any such change shall be notified on the Website. Your use of the Website following such notification shall be deemed to be your acceptance of such change.Important Information about the use of CookiesWith effect from 26 May 2012, the law requires that cookies can only be used on a website with the specific consent of the website user.  Marathon would like to place cookies on your computer to help us make this Website function better during your visit. Please note that when you confirm your acceptance of these terms and conditions you will be deemed to have granted us your consent to place cookies on your computer.For additional information about the cookies we use and why, and how to remove cookies, please see our Privacy and Cookies Policy.Regulatory InformationUnited KingdomThis Website is directed only at persons who are:accessing the Website from outside the European Economic Area; orinvestment professionals, falling within Article 19(5)(a) to (e) of The Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 (Financial Promotion) Order 2005 ("FPO") and/or Article 14(5)(a) to (e) of The Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 (Promotion of Collective Investment Schemes)(Exemptions) Order 2001 ("FPCISO"), who have professional experience in matters relating to relevant investments; orhigh net worth organisations falling within Article 49(2)(a) to (d) of the FPO and/or Article 22(2)(a) to (e) of the FPCISO, for example a company, unincorporated association or partnership with net assets of £5,000,000 or more, or the trustee of a trust where the value of the cash and investments forming part of the trust's assets (before deducting its liabilities) is £10,000,000 or more; orpersons to whom it may otherwise lawfully be communicated.All such persons together being referred to as "exempt persons".  The contents of the Website must not be acted upon or relied on by persons who are not exempt persons.  Any investment or investment activity to which the Website relates is available only to exempt persons and will be engaged in only with exempt persons.  If you have entered the Website and you are not an exempt person you must exit the Website immediately.Marathon Asset Management LLP is a limited liability partnership registered in England and Wales under number OC 305964, Orion House, 5 Upper St. Martin's Lane, London, WC2H 9EA, VAT number 840164747, is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority ("FCA"). It is entered in the FCA's register with number 229782: see http://www.fsa.gov.uk/register/home.do. United States of AmericaMarathon products are only available in the US to investors (generally institutions) which qualify as an "accredited investor" as defined in Rule 501(a) of the Securities Act of 1933. Information provided in this Website does not constitute an offer being made in the US. Marathon is also regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission in the US under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and trades under the name “Marathon-London”.  Marathon is not required to comply with the provisions of that Act as to its non-U.S. clients.  Accordingly, the protections of that Act will not be available to clients of Marathon who are not U.S. persons or to investors in any Marathon sponsored offshore fund, even if the investor happens to be a U.S. person.AustraliaIn Australia, Marathon’s investment management services are provided by Marathon Asset Management LLP under ASIC Class Order [CO 03/1099] and are available only to persons who qualify as "wholesale clients” (as defined under the Corporations Act 2001 (Commonwealth of Australia)). Accordingly, for persons accessing the Website from Australia, the material on the Website is directed only at persons who qualify as "wholesale clients” and no other persons should rely or act on any material contained in the Website.To the extent that the Website contains financial product advice, that advice is provided by Marathon Asset Management LLP.  Pursuant to ASIC Class Order 03/1099 Marathon Asset Management LLP is exempt from the requirement to hold an Australian financial services licence under the Corporations Act 2001 (Commonwealth of Australia) in respect of the provision of such financial product advice to “wholesale clients”.  Marathon Asset Management LLP is regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority of the United Kingdom under the laws of the United Kingdom, whose laws differ from Australian laws.CanadaMarathon provides investment advisory services in Alberta, Manitoba and Ontario to permitted clients only. South AfricaMarathon is licensed in South Africa as a financial services provider with FSP number 42011GeneralThe material on the Website does not amount to investment, tax, legal or other advice. For advice on these matters you should consult your professional adviser.The information contained within the Website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities in any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or in which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or to whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation. To view Marathon's disclosures as required under the EU Capital Requirements Directive see Capital Disclosures.  To view Marathon’s disclosures a required under the FCA’s remuneration code see Remuneration Disclosures. To view Marathon's disclosures as required under the Modern Slavery Act see Marathon’s anti-slavery and human trafficking policy statement.The other companies in the Marathon group are not authorised and regulated by the FCA and the material on this Website may relate to business in respect of which the UK financial services regulatory system does not apply.In relation to the information contained on this site, you should note that past performance is not a guide to future performance. The return on assets invested by a member of the Marathon Group may go down as well as up and there is no guarantee or assurance as to performance. If you wish to invest in a specific investment product managed by a member of the Marathon Group, you should refer to the risk warnings in the relevant marketing document for that product.Terms of UseAccess to and use of the WebsiteMarathon will endeavour to ensure that availability of the Website will be uninterrupted and that transmission will be error free. However due to the nature of the internet this cannot be guaranteed. You acknowledge that Marathon does not guarantee that access to the Website or to Client Area (as defined below) will be uninterrupted or error-free or that defects will be corrected or that the server providing access will be free of viruses or bugs.You must not use the Website for fraudulent purposes, or in connection with a criminal offence or other unlawful activity.The Website contains material which is owned by or licensed to Marathon. This material includes, but is not limited to, the design, layout, look and feel, appearance and graphics. It is protected by intellectual property laws including, but not limited to, those relating to copyright and trade marks.All rights are reserved except that permission is granted to download the materials contained on the Website to a single computer and to print a hard copy of such materials solely for personal, non-commercial use. Any other use of materials on the Website, including reproduction, modification, distribution or republication, without the prior written permission of Marathon, is strictly prohibited.LiabilityAlthough Marathon has used reasonable endeavours to ensure that the information and/or material contained on the Website is correct, Marathon does not make any representations or give any warranties that the information and/or material contained on or accessible via the Website is accurate, complete or current or that use of the Website is free of risk or viruses or other damage.  Access to and information contained on the Website is provided on an "as is" basis and you have sole responsibility for adequate protection and back up of data and/or equipment and for taking reasonable and appropriate precautions to scan for computer viruses or other destructive properties.Unless otherwise agreed in writing, Marathon shall not be liable to you in respect of (i) your use of the Website or (ii) the use, accessing, downloading or reliance on any information or other materials contained or referred to on the Website and accepts no liability for any loss of profits, business or anticipated profit or savings or loss of or corruption of data or any indirect loss or consequential loss suffered by you in relation to your use of the Website even if you have been advised by Marathon of the possibility of such loss.Nothing in these terms of use shall exclude or limit the liability of Marathon for death or personal injury due to its negligence or for its fraud. If you are located in Australia, nothing in these terms shall exclude, restrict or modify the application of a non-excludable warranty implied by law, the exercise of a right conferred under such a warranty or any liability for breach of such a warranty, provided that, to the extent permitted by law, Marathon’s liability for breach of such a warranty is limited to (at Marathon’s election) either supplying the relevant services again, or paying the cost of having the relevant services provided again.Client AreaMarathon may in its absolute discretion permit access to a private client area (the “Client Area”) of the Website by issuing you with a username and password, the use of which shall be subject to these terms of use and any supplemental terms notified to you from time to time.The Client Area of the Website includes additional information, including information and reports relating specifically to clients and client portfolios (“client-specific information”).  Your client-specific information will be made available if the specific username and password allocated by Marathon is entered but will not otherwise be available to users of the Client Area.Marathon will allocate a specific username and password to each of those persons (“Authorised Persons”) within your organisation or, where applicable, your consultant, to whom client-specific information is already sent.  You will be asked to confirm that the list of Authorised Persons is accurate.  Clients of Marathon agree that Marathon may grant access to the Client Area (including access to your client-specific information) whenever a valid username and password is used, whether or not the person using such username and password is an Authorised Person.  Once access is granted, all actions will be deemed to have been made by you.Usernames and passwords are intended only for the person, to whom Marathon allocates the username and password, and you shall ensure that no other person uses your username or password and that your username and password are kept secret and are not disclosed to any third party. You shall notify Marathon immediately of any unauthorised use of a username or password or if you wish to terminate a person’s access to the Client Area by sending an email to info@marathon.co.uk.You shall be solely responsible for the use of the Client Area accessed through your username and password and agree to indemnify Marathon against any claim, loss, cost, damage, action or expense suffered or incurred by Marathon as a result of the use of the Client Area accessed via your username and password or from your failure to comply with the terms of use and any supplemental terms agreed with you from time to time.Marathon may revoke access to the Client Area in its absolute discretion at any time without notice.LinksThe Website may contain links to third party websites, which are beyond the control of Marathon. Marathon does not accept any responsibility for the content of, nor for any transactions between you and such websites or any dealings with your personal information by such websites. No link is intended to be, nor should it be construed as, an endorsement of any kind by Marathon of the operator of that website.Transfer and Storage of Personal DataAny personal data provided by you to Marathon is done so with the knowledge and express agreement that Marathon may transfer and store such data outside the European Union.Market DataThird party data (including any benchmark data) remains the property of the data provider, and may not be reproduced or extracted and used for any other purpose without the data provider’s express consent.Applicable LawThese terms of use shall be governed by and construed exclusively in accordance with English law. Any dispute arising under these terms of use shall be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the English courts and, by using the Website, you hereby submit to and waive any objections to, the jurisdiction of such courts.   Print this page© 2016 Marathon Asset ManagementIssued in the UK by Marathon Asset Management LLP, which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.Site MapLegal Notice
	Marathon - Disclaimer







HomeAbout UsPhilosophyKey PeopleStewardshipStrategiesGlobal EquityInternational EquityInternational (ACWI ex US) EquityEuropean EquityUK EquityJapanese EquityPacific Basin EquityEmerging Markets Equity FundFund PricesGlobal Investment ReviewGIR LibraryContact UsCareersContact Us FormClient Area DisclaimerPLEASE READ THE REGULATORY INFORMATION AND TERMS OF USE CAREFULLY BEFORE YOU USE THIS WEBSITEMarathon Asset Management LLP ( "Marathon") provides access to, operates and issues the www.marathon.co.uk website (the "Website") subject to the terms and conditions of use (the "terms of use")set out on this page.In using the Website, you agree to the terms of use, including Marathon’s use of cookies on this Website, and the terms of the Privacy and Cookies Policy. If you do not accept any of them you should exit the Website now. Marathon reserves the right to change these terms of use from time to time and any such change shall be notified on the Website. Your use of the Website following such notification shall be deemed to be your acceptance of such change.Important Information about the use of CookiesWith effect from 26 May 2012, the law requires that cookies can only be used on a website with the specific consent of the website user.  Marathon would like to place cookies on your computer to help us make this Website function better during your visit. Please note that when you confirm your acceptance of these terms and conditions you will be deemed to have granted us your consent to place cookies on your computer.For additional information about the cookies we use and why, and how to remove cookies, please see our Privacy and Cookies Policy.Regulatory InformationUnited KingdomThis Website is directed only at persons who are:accessing the Website from outside the European Economic Area; orinvestment professionals, falling within Article 19(5)(a) to (e) of The Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 (Financial Promotion) Order 2005 ("FPO") and/or Article 14(5)(a) to (e) of The Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 (Promotion of Collective Investment Schemes)(Exemptions) Order 2001 ("FPCISO"), who have professional experience in matters relating to relevant investments; orhigh net worth organisations falling within Article 49(2)(a) to (d) of the FPO and/or Article 22(2)(a) to (e) of the FPCISO, for example a company, unincorporated association or partnership with net assets of £5,000,000 or more, or the trustee of a trust where the value of the cash and investments forming part of the trust's assets (before deducting its liabilities) is £10,000,000 or more; orpersons to whom it may otherwise lawfully be communicated.All such persons together being referred to as "exempt persons".  The contents of the Website must not be acted upon or relied on by persons who are not exempt persons.  Any investment or investment activity to which the Website relates is available only to exempt persons and will be engaged in only with exempt persons.  If you have entered the Website and you are not an exempt person you must exit the Website immediately.Marathon Asset Management LLP is a limited liability partnership registered in England and Wales under number OC 305964, Orion House, 5 Upper St. Martin's Lane, London, WC2H 9EA, VAT number 840164747, is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority ("FCA"). It is entered in the FCA's register with number 229782: see http://www.fsa.gov.uk/register/home.do. United States of AmericaMarathon products are only available in the US to investors (generally institutions) which qualify as an "accredited investor" as defined in Rule 501(a) of the Securities Act of 1933. Information provided in this Website does not constitute an offer being made in the US. Marathon is also regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission in the US under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and trades under the name “Marathon-London”.  Marathon is not required to comply with the provisions of that Act as to its non-U.S. clients.  Accordingly, the protections of that Act will not be available to clients of Marathon who are not U.S. persons or to investors in any Marathon sponsored offshore fund, even if the investor happens to be a U.S. person.AustraliaIn Australia, Marathon’s investment management services are provided by Marathon Asset Management LLP under ASIC Class Order [CO 03/1099] and are available only to persons who qualify as "wholesale clients” (as defined under the Corporations Act 2001 (Commonwealth of Australia)). Accordingly, for persons accessing the Website from Australia, the material on the Website is directed only at persons who qualify as "wholesale clients” and no other persons should rely or act on any material contained in the Website.To the extent that the Website contains financial product advice, that advice is provided by Marathon Asset Management LLP.  Pursuant to ASIC Class Order 03/1099 Marathon Asset Management LLP is exempt from the requirement to hold an Australian financial services licence under the Corporations Act 2001 (Commonwealth of Australia) in respect of the provision of such financial product advice to “wholesale clients”.  Marathon Asset Management LLP is regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority of the United Kingdom under the laws of the United Kingdom, whose laws differ from Australian laws.CanadaMarathon provides investment advisory services in Alberta, Manitoba and Ontario to permitted clients only. South AfricaMarathon is licensed in South Africa as a financial services provider with FSP number 42011GeneralThe material on the Website does not amount to investment, tax, legal or other advice. For advice on these matters you should consult your professional adviser.The information contained within the Website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities in any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or in which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or to whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation. To view Marathon's disclosures as required under the EU Capital Requirements Directive see Capital Disclosures.  To view Marathon’s disclosures a required under the FCA’s remuneration code see Remuneration Disclosures. To view Marathon's disclosures as required under the Modern Slavery Act see Marathon’s anti-slavery and human trafficking policy statement.The other companies in the Marathon group are not authorised and regulated by the FCA and the material on this Website may relate to business in respect of which the UK financial services regulatory system does not apply.In relation to the information contained on this site, you should note that past performance is not a guide to future performance. The return on assets invested by a member of the Marathon Group may go down as well as up and there is no guarantee or assurance as to performance. If you wish to invest in a specific investment product managed by a member of the Marathon Group, you should refer to the risk warnings in the relevant marketing document for that product.Terms of UseAccess to and use of the WebsiteMarathon will endeavour to ensure that availability of the Website will be uninterrupted and that transmission will be error free. However due to the nature of the internet this cannot be guaranteed. You acknowledge that Marathon does not guarantee that access to the Website or to Client Area (as defined below) will be uninterrupted or error-free or that defects will be corrected or that the server providing access will be free of viruses or bugs.You must not use the Website for fraudulent purposes, or in connection with a criminal offence or other unlawful activity.The Website contains material which is owned by or licensed to Marathon. This material includes, but is not limited to, the design, layout, look and feel, appearance and graphics. It is protected by intellectual property laws including, but not limited to, those relating to copyright and trade marks.All rights are reserved except that permission is granted to download the materials contained on the Website to a single computer and to print a hard copy of such materials solely for personal, non-commercial use. Any other use of materials on the Website, including reproduction, modification, distribution or republication, without the prior written permission of Marathon, is strictly prohibited.LiabilityAlthough Marathon has used reasonable endeavours to ensure that the information and/or material contained on the Website is correct, Marathon does not make any representations or give any warranties that the information and/or material contained on or accessible via the Website is accurate, complete or current or that use of the Website is free of risk or viruses or other damage.  Access to and information contained on the Website is provided on an "as is" basis and you have sole responsibility for adequate protection and back up of data and/or equipment and for taking reasonable and appropriate precautions to scan for computer viruses or other destructive properties.Unless otherwise agreed in writing, Marathon shall not be liable to you in respect of (i) your use of the Website or (ii) the use, accessing, downloading or reliance on any information or other materials contained or referred to on the Website and accepts no liability for any loss of profits, business or anticipated profit or savings or loss of or corruption of data or any indirect loss or consequential loss suffered by you in relation to your use of the Website even if you have been advised by Marathon of the possibility of such loss.Nothing in these terms of use shall exclude or limit the liability of Marathon for death or personal injury due to its negligence or for its fraud. If you are located in Australia, nothing in these terms shall exclude, restrict or modify the application of a non-excludable warranty implied by law, the exercise of a right conferred under such a warranty or any liability for breach of such a warranty, provided that, to the extent permitted by law, Marathon’s liability for breach of such a warranty is limited to (at Marathon’s election) either supplying the relevant services again, or paying the cost of having the relevant services provided again.Client AreaMarathon may in its absolute discretion permit access to a private client area (the “Client Area”) of the Website by issuing you with a username and password, the use of which shall be subject to these terms of use and any supplemental terms notified to you from time to time.The Client Area of the Website includes additional information, including information and reports relating specifically to clients and client portfolios (“client-specific information”).  Your client-specific information will be made available if the specific username and password allocated by Marathon is entered but will not otherwise be available to users of the Client Area.Marathon will allocate a specific username and password to each of those persons (“Authorised Persons”) within your organisation or, where applicable, your consultant, to whom client-specific information is already sent.  You will be asked to confirm that the list of Authorised Persons is accurate.  Clients of Marathon agree that Marathon may grant access to the Client Area (including access to your client-specific information) whenever a valid username and password is used, whether or not the person using such username and password is an Authorised Person.  Once access is granted, all actions will be deemed to have been made by you.Usernames and passwords are intended only for the person, to whom Marathon allocates the username and password, and you shall ensure that no other person uses your username or password and that your username and password are kept secret and are not disclosed to any third party. You shall notify Marathon immediately of any unauthorised use of a username or password or if you wish to terminate a person’s access to the Client Area by sending an email to info@marathon.co.uk.You shall be solely responsible for the use of the Client Area accessed through your username and password and agree to indemnify Marathon against any claim, loss, cost, damage, action or expense suffered or incurred by Marathon as a result of the use of the Client Area accessed via your username and password or from your failure to comply with the terms of use and any supplemental terms agreed with you from time to time.Marathon may revoke access to the Client Area in its absolute discretion at any time without notice.LinksThe Website may contain links to third party websites, which are beyond the control of Marathon. Marathon does not accept any responsibility for the content of, nor for any transactions between you and such websites or any dealings with your personal information by such websites. No link is intended to be, nor should it be construed as, an endorsement of any kind by Marathon of the operator of that website.Transfer and Storage of Personal DataAny personal data provided by you to Marathon is done so with the knowledge and express agreement that Marathon may transfer and store such data outside the European Union.Market DataThird party data (including any benchmark data) remains the property of the data provider, and may not be reproduced or extracted and used for any other purpose without the data provider’s express consent.Applicable LawThese terms of use shall be governed by and construed exclusively in accordance with English law. Any dispute arising under these terms of use shall be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the English courts and, by using the Website, you hereby submit to and waive any objections to, the jurisdiction of such courts.   Print this page© 2016 Marathon Asset ManagementIssued in the UK by Marathon Asset Management LLP, which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.Site MapLegal Notice










 




Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version























 





MARATHON LONDON GLOBAL INVESTMENT TRUST I Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      MARATHON LONDON GLOBAL INVESTMENT TRUST I
                    

•   CHICAGLO, IL
                          • Trust
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Marathon London Global Investment Trust I is based out of Chicaglo.    The firm last filed a Form D notice of exempt offering of securities on 2016-12-22. The filing was for a pooled investment fund:  other investment fund The notice  included securities offered of Pooled Investment Fund Interests
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)
Form D 5



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from MARATHON LONDON GLOBAL INVESTMENT TRUST I, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




marathon london global investment trust i


C/O THE NORTHERN TRUST COMPANY

CHICAGLO
IL
                                                        
                                                    60603


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      (312) 630-1414







Recent SEC Filings




D/A filed on 12/22/2016
D/A filed on 12/15/2015
D/A filed on 12/23/2014
D/A filed on 01/22/2014
D/A filed on 10/01/2012
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...



Form D Filings

  Form D is a form to be used to file a notice of an exempt offering of securities with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
  Form D contains basic information about the offering and the company.


Form D Filings


Filing Date
Form Type
Industry Group
Securities Offered
Total Offering Amount
Total Amount Sold
Total Remaining




2016-12-22
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
538,134,175
INDEFINITE


2015-12-15
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
538,134,175
INDEFINITE


2014-12-23
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
533,113,450
INDEFINITE


2014-01-22
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
450,170,636
INDEFINITE


2012-10-01
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
450,082,735
INDEFINITE




Other Issuers in Filings


Name
Address





  No Other Issuers
  




Related Parties included in filings


Name
Address
Relationship




SEE CLARIFICATION   SEE CLARIFICATION

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      











Elevate your investments
Try it for free


















	Marathon - Disclaimer







HomeAbout UsPhilosophyKey PeopleStewardshipStrategiesGlobal EquityInternational EquityInternational (ACWI ex US) EquityEuropean EquityUK EquityJapanese EquityPacific Basin EquityEmerging Markets Equity FundFund PricesGlobal Investment ReviewGIR LibraryContact UsCareersContact Us FormClient Area DisclaimerPLEASE READ THE REGULATORY INFORMATION AND TERMS OF USE CAREFULLY BEFORE YOU USE THIS WEBSITEMarathon Asset Management LLP ( "Marathon") provides access to, operates and issues the www.marathon.co.uk website (the "Website") subject to the terms and conditions of use (the "terms of use")set out on this page.In using the Website, you agree to the terms of use, including Marathon’s use of cookies on this Website, and the terms of the Privacy and Cookies Policy. If you do not accept any of them you should exit the Website now. Marathon reserves the right to change these terms of use from time to time and any such change shall be notified on the Website. Your use of the Website following such notification shall be deemed to be your acceptance of such change.Important Information about the use of CookiesWith effect from 26 May 2012, the law requires that cookies can only be used on a website with the specific consent of the website user.  Marathon would like to place cookies on your computer to help us make this Website function better during your visit. Please note that when you confirm your acceptance of these terms and conditions you will be deemed to have granted us your consent to place cookies on your computer.For additional information about the cookies we use and why, and how to remove cookies, please see our Privacy and Cookies Policy.Regulatory InformationUnited KingdomThis Website is directed only at persons who are:accessing the Website from outside the European Economic Area; orinvestment professionals, falling within Article 19(5)(a) to (e) of The Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 (Financial Promotion) Order 2005 ("FPO") and/or Article 14(5)(a) to (e) of The Financial Services and Markets Act 2000 (Promotion of Collective Investment Schemes)(Exemptions) Order 2001 ("FPCISO"), who have professional experience in matters relating to relevant investments; orhigh net worth organisations falling within Article 49(2)(a) to (d) of the FPO and/or Article 22(2)(a) to (e) of the FPCISO, for example a company, unincorporated association or partnership with net assets of £5,000,000 or more, or the trustee of a trust where the value of the cash and investments forming part of the trust's assets (before deducting its liabilities) is £10,000,000 or more; orpersons to whom it may otherwise lawfully be communicated.All such persons together being referred to as "exempt persons".  The contents of the Website must not be acted upon or relied on by persons who are not exempt persons.  Any investment or investment activity to which the Website relates is available only to exempt persons and will be engaged in only with exempt persons.  If you have entered the Website and you are not an exempt person you must exit the Website immediately.Marathon Asset Management LLP is a limited liability partnership registered in England and Wales under number OC 305964, Orion House, 5 Upper St. Martin's Lane, London, WC2H 9EA, VAT number 840164747, is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority ("FCA"). It is entered in the FCA's register with number 229782: see http://www.fsa.gov.uk/register/home.do. United States of AmericaMarathon products are only available in the US to investors (generally institutions) which qualify as an "accredited investor" as defined in Rule 501(a) of the Securities Act of 1933. Information provided in this Website does not constitute an offer being made in the US. Marathon is also regulated by the Securities and Exchange Commission in the US under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and trades under the name “Marathon-London”.  Marathon is not required to comply with the provisions of that Act as to its non-U.S. clients.  Accordingly, the protections of that Act will not be available to clients of Marathon who are not U.S. persons or to investors in any Marathon sponsored offshore fund, even if the investor happens to be a U.S. person.AustraliaIn Australia, Marathon’s investment management services are provided by Marathon Asset Management LLP under ASIC Class Order [CO 03/1099] and are available only to persons who qualify as "wholesale clients” (as defined under the Corporations Act 2001 (Commonwealth of Australia)). Accordingly, for persons accessing the Website from Australia, the material on the Website is directed only at persons who qualify as "wholesale clients” and no other persons should rely or act on any material contained in the Website.To the extent that the Website contains financial product advice, that advice is provided by Marathon Asset Management LLP.  Pursuant to ASIC Class Order 03/1099 Marathon Asset Management LLP is exempt from the requirement to hold an Australian financial services licence under the Corporations Act 2001 (Commonwealth of Australia) in respect of the provision of such financial product advice to “wholesale clients”.  Marathon Asset Management LLP is regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority of the United Kingdom under the laws of the United Kingdom, whose laws differ from Australian laws.CanadaMarathon provides investment advisory services in Alberta, Manitoba and Ontario to permitted clients only. South AfricaMarathon is licensed in South Africa as a financial services provider with FSP number 42011GeneralThe material on the Website does not amount to investment, tax, legal or other advice. For advice on these matters you should consult your professional adviser.The information contained within the Website does not constitute an offer of or an invitation to apply for securities in any jurisdiction where such offer or invitation is unlawful or in which the person making such offer is not qualified to do so or to whom it is unlawful to make such offer or solicitation. To view Marathon's disclosures as required under the EU Capital Requirements Directive see Capital Disclosures.  To view Marathon’s disclosures a required under the FCA’s remuneration code see Remuneration Disclosures. To view Marathon's disclosures as required under the Modern Slavery Act see Marathon’s anti-slavery and human trafficking policy statement.The other companies in the Marathon group are not authorised and regulated by the FCA and the material on this Website may relate to business in respect of which the UK financial services regulatory system does not apply.In relation to the information contained on this site, you should note that past performance is not a guide to future performance. The return on assets invested by a member of the Marathon Group may go down as well as up and there is no guarantee or assurance as to performance. If you wish to invest in a specific investment product managed by a member of the Marathon Group, you should refer to the risk warnings in the relevant marketing document for that product.Terms of UseAccess to and use of the WebsiteMarathon will endeavour to ensure that availability of the Website will be uninterrupted and that transmission will be error free. However due to the nature of the internet this cannot be guaranteed. You acknowledge that Marathon does not guarantee that access to the Website or to Client Area (as defined below) will be uninterrupted or error-free or that defects will be corrected or that the server providing access will be free of viruses or bugs.You must not use the Website for fraudulent purposes, or in connection with a criminal offence or other unlawful activity.The Website contains material which is owned by or licensed to Marathon. This material includes, but is not limited to, the design, layout, look and feel, appearance and graphics. It is protected by intellectual property laws including, but not limited to, those relating to copyright and trade marks.All rights are reserved except that permission is granted to download the materials contained on the Website to a single computer and to print a hard copy of such materials solely for personal, non-commercial use. Any other use of materials on the Website, including reproduction, modification, distribution or republication, without the prior written permission of Marathon, is strictly prohibited.LiabilityAlthough Marathon has used reasonable endeavours to ensure that the information and/or material contained on the Website is correct, Marathon does not make any representations or give any warranties that the information and/or material contained on or accessible via the Website is accurate, complete or current or that use of the Website is free of risk or viruses or other damage.  Access to and information contained on the Website is provided on an "as is" basis and you have sole responsibility for adequate protection and back up of data and/or equipment and for taking reasonable and appropriate precautions to scan for computer viruses or other destructive properties.Unless otherwise agreed in writing, Marathon shall not be liable to you in respect of (i) your use of the Website or (ii) the use, accessing, downloading or reliance on any information or other materials contained or referred to on the Website and accepts no liability for any loss of profits, business or anticipated profit or savings or loss of or corruption of data or any indirect loss or consequential loss suffered by you in relation to your use of the Website even if you have been advised by Marathon of the possibility of such loss.Nothing in these terms of use shall exclude or limit the liability of Marathon for death or personal injury due to its negligence or for its fraud. If you are located in Australia, nothing in these terms shall exclude, restrict or modify the application of a non-excludable warranty implied by law, the exercise of a right conferred under such a warranty or any liability for breach of such a warranty, provided that, to the extent permitted by law, Marathon’s liability for breach of such a warranty is limited to (at Marathon’s election) either supplying the relevant services again, or paying the cost of having the relevant services provided again.Client AreaMarathon may in its absolute discretion permit access to a private client area (the “Client Area”) of the Website by issuing you with a username and password, the use of which shall be subject to these terms of use and any supplemental terms notified to you from time to time.The Client Area of the Website includes additional information, including information and reports relating specifically to clients and client portfolios (“client-specific information”).  Your client-specific information will be made available if the specific username and password allocated by Marathon is entered but will not otherwise be available to users of the Client Area.Marathon will allocate a specific username and password to each of those persons (“Authorised Persons”) within your organisation or, where applicable, your consultant, to whom client-specific information is already sent.  You will be asked to confirm that the list of Authorised Persons is accurate.  Clients of Marathon agree that Marathon may grant access to the Client Area (including access to your client-specific information) whenever a valid username and password is used, whether or not the person using such username and password is an Authorised Person.  Once access is granted, all actions will be deemed to have been made by you.Usernames and passwords are intended only for the person, to whom Marathon allocates the username and password, and you shall ensure that no other person uses your username or password and that your username and password are kept secret and are not disclosed to any third party. You shall notify Marathon immediately of any unauthorised use of a username or password or if you wish to terminate a person’s access to the Client Area by sending an email to info@marathon.co.uk.You shall be solely responsible for the use of the Client Area accessed through your username and password and agree to indemnify Marathon against any claim, loss, cost, damage, action or expense suffered or incurred by Marathon as a result of the use of the Client Area accessed via your username and password or from your failure to comply with the terms of use and any supplemental terms agreed with you from time to time.Marathon may revoke access to the Client Area in its absolute discretion at any time without notice.LinksThe Website may contain links to third party websites, which are beyond the control of Marathon. Marathon does not accept any responsibility for the content of, nor for any transactions between you and such websites or any dealings with your personal information by such websites. No link is intended to be, nor should it be construed as, an endorsement of any kind by Marathon of the operator of that website.Transfer and Storage of Personal DataAny personal data provided by you to Marathon is done so with the knowledge and express agreement that Marathon may transfer and store such data outside the European Union.Market DataThird party data (including any benchmark data) remains the property of the data provider, and may not be reproduced or extracted and used for any other purpose without the data provider’s express consent.Applicable LawThese terms of use shall be governed by and construed exclusively in accordance with English law. Any dispute arising under these terms of use shall be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the English courts and, by using the Website, you hereby submit to and waive any objections to, the jurisdiction of such courts.   Print this page© 2016 Marathon Asset ManagementIssued in the UK by Marathon Asset Management LLP, which is authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority.Site MapLegal Notice










 


 

Marathon London Global Investment Trust I - Funding history, company info, news ...































Want to see more?Want to find out who got funded, and who’s funding the next big thing? in real time? all across the world? tailored to your specific areas of focus?100+ deals per dayGet access to the most exhaustive worldwide funding watch on the web!Comprehensive funding informationKnow about who invested in a company, which sites covered the event, the funding history, etc.Exclusive insightsView original analytics such as most dynamic industries, most active investors, and more!Stay aware!Get emailed when deals critical to your business happen. Filter by region, industry and topics of interest.As seen onHave a login?Sign inRegister now!It's free!Use your social accountOr fill in the quick form:Register nowpromise we won't spamSign invia your social account:via your existing WGF account:Remember meRegister, it's freeForgot your password?SIGN INForgot your password?Enter your e-mail and we will send you your new password.reset passwordThe world's largest funding base/companies/79532-marathon-london-global-investment-trust-isection=companies&subsection=detail&id=79532  




			Search deals by company name, industry, location, investors...			
			




SEARCH


Marathon London Global Investment Trust ICompany DetailsGet alertedif Marathon London Global Investment Trust I gets funded!Marathon London Global Investment Trust IFunding history Key peopleCountry:State:City:United StatesIllinoisChicagloIndustry:Finance Funding history DateDeal sizeInvestors September 19th, 2012$450,082,735-View DealCreate alertManage your alerts in accountWant to know when Marathon London Global Investment Trust I gets funded?Key peopleSee Clarification See ClarificationExecutive Officer, PromoterPlease note that all data is automatically extracted and errors can occur.The WhoGotFunded team has not necessarily reviewed the information in this page and has not determined if it is accurate and complete.Inaccurate Data? Help us improve WhoGotFunded: post a comment!﻿







Marathon London Global Investment Trust I  Filing. Jim E Hachey  Filed Dec 14  D Filing – Octafinance






















































 








Wednesday, 26 July 2017

























 

Menu



Featured News


						2 years ago - Alphabet Inc (NASDAQ:GOOGL) Tests Its Ad Technology On Billboards To Cushion Itself Against Ad Blocks


						2 years ago - China Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking Crisis


						2 years ago - Marc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and Gold


						2 years ago - Carl Icahn Criticizes the Fed. Feels Bad For Investors Buying Junk Bonds


						2 years ago - John Burbank: European QE Can’t Save The Markets Same As the U.S. Quantitative Easing. Everything Will Be Liquidated










Marathon London Global Investment Trust I  Filing. Jim E Hachey  Filed Dec 14  D Filing


12/21/2015  by OctaStaff 
			in Private Financing News 












Share with your friendsYour NameYour EmailRecipient EmailEnter a MessageI read this article and found it very interesting, thought it might be interesting for you. The article is called Marathon London Global Investment Trust I  Filing. Jim E Hachey  Filed Dec 14  D Filing and is was published by Octafinance.com at http://www.octafinance.com/marathon-london-global-investment-trust-i-filing-jim-e-hachey-filed-dec-14-d-filing/315641/.CaptchaSubmit
Marathon London Global Investment Trust I Form D
The United Kingdom-based Marathon London Global Investment Trust I had published FormD about $538.13 million offering. The date of first sale was 1994-08-15. The raised $538.13 million. The offering is still open. The total offering amount amount was $538.13 million. The form was filed on 2015-12-14. Marathon London Global Investment Trust I’s clarification was: This is an estimate of management fees paid to the Investment Manager during the period of November 1, 2014 to October 31, 2015. 
 Marathon London Global Investment Trust I is based in United Kingdom. The firm’s business is Pooled Investment Fund. The D form was filed by Jim E Hachey Vice President, The Northern Trust Company, Trustee. The company was incorporated more than five years ago. The filler’s address is: C/O The Northern Trust Company, 50 Lasalle Street, Chicaglo, Il, Illinois, 60603. See Clarification See Clarification is the related person in the form and it has address: 50 South Lasalle Street, Chicago, Il, Illinois, 60603. Link to Marathon London Global Investment Trust I Filing: 000093236115000001.
Analysis of Marathon London Global Investment Trust I Offering
On average, firms in the Pooled Investment Fund sector, sell 37.80 % investment fund interests. Marathon London Global Investment Trust I sold 100.00 % of the offering. The average offering size is $24.76 million for companies in the Pooled Investment Fund industry sector. The minimum investment for Marathon London Global Investment Trust I ‘s offering is $25000000.

Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.







 
Tagged: Fundraising $1m+Pooled Investment Fund



Today ZUCKERMAN INVESTMENT GROUP Filed Its Q3 2015 13F World Panel  $15.00 million  Financing. John A Anderson  Submitted Dec 14  SEC Filing 



 





Free Email Newsletter
    Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:







Hedge Fund NewsTop 10 CITADEL ADVISORS 13F Holdings in Q3 2015DF DENT & CO INC Just Released Its Q3 2015 Stock PositionsMAVERICK CAPITAL Top 10 Holdings in Q3 2015Analyzing Ken Griffins CITADEL ADVISORS Stock Holdings in Q3 2015LONE PINE CAPITAL Top 10 13F Positions in Q3 2015Guru NewsFelix Zulauf Sees a Stock Market Correction Coming. This Rally S&P 500 (INDEXSP:.INX) Will Be Short-LivedMarc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and GoldJim Grant: The Next Thing Might Be Helicopter Money. What to Buy and Where He Sees Investment OpportunitiesKyle Bass Bearish on Emerging Markets for at least 2 More Years. Looking to Short CurrenciesDavid Tepper Gets Defensive. Is it Time to Get Out of The Stock Market?


CTAs NewsRed Rock Just Published Report About The Trend Following Landscape & How CTAs’ Performance Must Be AnalyzedHow to Implement Dual Momentum for non-US InvestorsDo Commodity Trading Advisors (CTAs) Really Provide Crisis Alpha, Equity Hedge and Are Long Volatility?























Marathon Asset  Management  :: New York Based Fund :: 



























 
 













  
Career Opportunities
   |   
Contact Us
  
Investor Login  

							



 
 
  

 


					"Best-in-class" investment manager focused on opportunistic investing in credit and fixed income markets globally, utilizing Marathon's integrated platform, deep fundamental research and situational expertise
					

 
 
  
  




				ABOUT MARATHON
				

				STRATEGIES: Opportunistic Credit Investing
				

 
  
 




Firm Overview Investment Philosophy Business Principles Philanthropy Capabilities Leadership Public Private Investment Partnership 




 




Corporate Credit Structured Credit Emerging Markets Credit Separate Account Platform Private Funds Platform 




 




Marathon Asset Management Announces Strategic Investment by Blackstone It’s a ‘G’ Thing: R Baby Foundation raises money and provides pediatric training for hospitalsBruce Richards' Interviews Marathon CEO on Distressed Debt and Drug Pricing 9.28.2016 – Bloomberg TV – Marathon’s Bruce Richards on Brexit, Distressed Debt Bruce Richards discusses current credit opportunities in energy, Europe and Puerto Rico  Marathon's Richards Investing in Ireland, Puerto Rico Bruce Richards gives the commencement address at the University of Maryland, Smith School of Business Dems Are Fixed on Revenue Increases How Much Stability Is There in Europe? Charlie Rose Interviews Bruce RichardsWhite Paper: European Sovereign & Financial Debt CrisisS&P Interviews Andrew Brady on the CLO Market at Leveraged Loan Roundtable




 
 
  




© 2017  Marathon Asset Management. All rights reserved. 



 NEW YORK    |    LONDON    |    SINGAPORE







 Emergency Contact Information |  Terms of Use 



 
  

			This is not an offer or solicitation to invest in our private funds.  
			Please see Terms of Use

 




Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












International Stock Trading - Fidelity Investments















































Print
 Email


Email








Send to (Separate multiple email addresses with commas)


Please enter a valid email address


Your email address

Please enter a valid email address


Message (Optional)








Important legal information about the email you will be sending. By using this service, you agree to input your real email address and only send it to people you know. It is a violation of law in some jurisdictions to falsely identify yourself in an email. All information you provide will be used by Fidelity solely for the purpose of sending the email on your behalf. The subject line of the email you send will be "Fidelity.com: "




Email




Your email has been sent.


Share


Share





Mutual Funds and Mutual Fund Investing - Fidelity Investments
Clicking a link will open a new window.

Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Google+




Default text size A


Larger text size A


Largest text size A
 














Stock Trading Overview














                                                        
                                                       
                                                           International Stock Trading
                                                        

                                           

			Invest in international companies that may offer significant growth potential, while gaining both geographical and currency diversification.
Open an Account








 What you can do 

Trade in 25 countries with the flexibility to settle in either U.S. dollars or the local currency.
Exchange between 16 different currencies, offering you the potential to capitalize on foreign exchange fluctuations.
Trade domestic and international stocks in a single account.
Access real-time market data to trade around the world and around the clock.
Research international stocks with timely pricing information, news, independent research, and advanced charting.
Speak with dedicated international trading specialists.

All nonretirement brokerage accounts are eligible to add the international stock trading feature.











Markets




Australia
Austria
Belgium
Canada
Denmark
Finland
France
Germany
Greece






Hong Kong
Ireland
Italy
Japan
Mexico
Netherlands
New Zealand
Norway






Poland
Portugal
Singapore
South Africa
Spain
Sweden
Switzerland
United Kingdom








Currencies




Australian dollar (AUD)
British pound (GBP)
Canadian dollar (CAD)
Danish krone (DKK)
Euro (EUR)
Hong Kong dollar (HKD)
Japanese yen (JPY)
Mexican peso (MXN)






New Zealand dollar (NZD)
Norwegian krone (NOK)
Polish zloty (PLN)
Singapore dollar (SGD)
South African rand (ZAR)
Swedish krona (SEK)
Swiss franc (CHF)
U.S. dollar (USD)





Note: The euro is the local currency for the following markets: Austria, Belgium, Finland, France, Germany, Greece, Ireland, Italy, Netherlands, Portugal, and Spain.











 Get more details 
Visit stock FAQs: international stock trading to learn more about:International stock commissions, currency exchange fees, and other price requirements.Finding stock symbols and getting a quote.How to place an order.Board lots and tick sizes for the various exchanges.Managing your account.










Next step







Sign up for international stock trading.













International trading supplement (PDF)

 













Questions?
Call an international trading specialist


800-544-2976
800-544-2976

Chat with a representative






Other ways to invest internationally



ETFs




Mutual funds




Depository receipt stocks








Get our free mobile app


Keep up with the changing markets, research, trade, & more, wherever you are.

















          Real-time international market data is only available to qualified non-professional users as defined in the NASDAQ User Agreement for Real-Time Quotes (PDF).
	
    

Foreign investments involve greater risks than U.S. investments, including political and economic risks and the risk of currency fluctuations, all of which may be magnified in emerging markets.


The risk of loss in trading foreign currency can be substantial and may be magnified if trading on margin. Customers should therefore carefully consider whether such trading is suitable for them in light of their financial condition, risk tolerance and understanding of foreign markets. These risks include foreign currency risk and liquidation risk.


          Currency exchanges are completed on behalf of Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC by Fidelity FOREX, Inc., a Fidelity affiliate and may include a mark-up. More favorable exchange rates may be available through third parties not affiliated with Fidelity.
	
    


612328.4.1










Mutual Funds


ETFs


Fixed Income


Bonds


CDs


Options

Active Trader Pro



Stocks


Online Trading


Annuities


Life Insurance & Long Term Care

Small Business Retirement Plans



IRAs


Retirement Products


Retirement Planning


529 Plans

FINRA's BrokerCheck
Guest Access






Stay Connected 




			                Locate an Investor Center by ZIP Code
					








							 
							   Please enter a valid ZIP code
							
						  












Facebook





Twitter





LinkedIn





Google+





YouTube





Fidelity Mobile®













Careers


News Releases


About Fidelity


International






Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.


Terms of Use


Privacy


Security


Site Map

Accessibility

This is for persons in the U.S. only.

















 




Trading & Brokerage Services - Fidelity




















































Print
 Email


Email








Send to (Separate multiple email addresses with commas)


Please enter a valid email address


Your email address

Please enter a valid email address


Message (Optional)








Important legal information about the email you will be sending. By using this service, you agree to input your real email address and only send it to people you know. It is a violation of law in some jurisdictions to falsely identify yourself in an email. All information you provide will be used by Fidelity solely for the purpose of sending the email on your behalf. The subject line of the email you send will be "Fidelity.com: "




Email




Your email has been sent.


Share


Share





Mutual Funds and Mutual Fund Investing - Fidelity Investments
Clicking a link will open a new window.

Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Google+



 













                                                        
                                                       
                                                           Trading at Fidelity
                                                        

                                           

			With low rates, exceptional service, and powerful tools and research, there's a reason why serious investors choose to trade at Fidelity.
		





















Trades are just $4.95
We cut the price of online U.S. equity trades to give you more value. Trade with a clear advantage.

Open an account





Great value, broad choice, advanced online trading



Low pricing

Pay just $4.951 for U.S. equity and option trades, plus $0.65 per options contract. Get margin rates as low as 4.25%.2




Range of investments


Buy and sell stocks, options, ETFs, mutual funds, bonds and CDs, IPOs, and precious metals.




For Active Traders


Get dedicated support and advanced tools to meet your sophisticated trading needs.








The Fidelity Account®
Our trading account


text




Explore the details of this comprehensive brokerage account from Fidelity, consistently recognized among the best online brokers.3

Trade wherever you are: Online trading | Mobile trading
 Open a Brokerage Account








Industry-best capabilities

Just rated 2017 Best Online Broker by Barron's3 and rated Best Online Broker in 2017 by Investor's Business Daily,4 plus the only firm rated #1 in 2016 by Kiplinger's,5 Barron's, and Investor's Business Daily.










Compare us to your online broker

 






Why trade with Fidelity?


$4.95 for online U.S. equity trades
Buy 70 iShares® ETFs, 11 Fidelity sector ETFs, 3 Fidelity active fixed income ETFs, and 6 new Fidelity factor ETFs—commission-free online
Easy-to-use tools that offer advanced online trading technology
Experienced investment and trading specialists available 24/7




Discover your next investing strategy

Investment research

Fidelity accountholders can access free, independent research from 20+ leading providers.
Don't miss out on investing insights

Stay notified about upcoming live Fidelity webinars. Subscribe today
















Questions?


800-353-4881
800-353-4881






Sign up for free Guest Access
Try our research, tools, and more without opening an account.





What's New in Brokerage

We're committed to making your saving, investing, and trading experience even better. See our latest enhancements.




From our experts




										
										Dow days of summer 





										
										Q3 market update 





										
										Q3 market update 







Get 500 free trades
Earn up to 500 commission free trades, good for 2 years, and access to Active Trader Pro® when you open and fund a brokerage account or IRA.















Free commission offer applies to online purchases of Fidelity ETFs and select iShares ETFs in a Fidelity brokerage account. Fidelity accounts may require minimum balances. The sale of ETFs is subject to an activity assessment fee (from $0.01 to $0.03 per $1,000 of principal). iShares ETFs and Fidelity ETFs are subject to a short-term trading fee by Fidelity if held less than 30 days.



          1.
	
	
	       $4.95 commission applies to online U.S. equity trades in a Fidelity retail account only for Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC retail clients. Certain accounts may require a minimum opening balance of $2,500. Sell orders are subject to an activity assessment fee (from $0.01 to $0.03 per $1,000 of principal). Other conditions may apply. See Fidelity.com/commissions for details. Employee equity compensation transactions and accounts managed by advisors or intermediaries through Fidelity Clearing and Custody Solutions are subject to different commission schedules.


Sell orders are subject to an activity assessment fee (from $0.01 to $0.03 per $1,000 of principal). Trades are limited to online domestic equities and options and must be used within two years. Options trades are limited to 20 contracts per trade. Offer valid for new and existing Fidelity customers opening or adding net new assets to an eligible Fidelity IRA or brokerage account. Deposits of $50,000-$99,999 will receive 300 free trades, and deposits of $100,000 or more will receive 500 free trades. Account balance of $50,000 of net new assets must be maintained for at least nine months; otherwise, normal commission schedule rates may be retroactively applied to any free trade executions. See Fidelity.com/ATP500free for further details and full offer terms. Fidelity reserves the right to modify these terms and conditions or terminate this offer at any time. Other terms and conditions, or eligibility criteria may apply.



ETFs are subject to market fluctuation and the risks of their underlying investments. ETFs are subject to management fees and other expenses. Unlike mutual funds, ETF shares are bought and sold at market price, which may be higher or lower than their NAV, and are not individually redeemed from the fund.



Options trading entails significant risk and is not appropriate for all investors. Certain complex options strategies carry additional risk. Before trading options, please read Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options. Supporting documentation for any claims, if applicable, will be furnished upon request.


          2. 4.25% rate available for debit balances over $1,000,000. Fidelity's current Base Margin Rate, effective since 6/16/2017, is 7.325%.
	
    

Margin trading entails greater risk, including, but not limited to, risk of loss and incurrence of margin interest debt, and is not suitable for all investors. Please assess your financial circumstances and risk tolerance before trading on margin. Margin credit is extended by National Financial Services, Member NYSE, SIPC.


          3. Barron's, March 20, 2017 and March 19, 2016 Online Broker Surveys. 2017: Fidelity was evaluated against 15 others and earned the top overall score of 35.6 out of a possible 40. The firm was also named best online broker for Long-Term Investing (shared with 2 others), Best for Novices (shared with 1 other), and Best for Investor Education (shared with 2 others). Fidelity was also ranked 1st in the following categories: Trading Experience & Technology (shared with 2 others), Mobile (shared with 1 other), Research Amenities, and Portfolio Analysis and Reports (shared with 2 others). 2016: Fidelity was evaluated against 15 others and earned the top overall score of 34.9 out of a possible 40.0. Fidelity was also named Best Online Broker for Long-Term Investing (shared with one other), Best for Novices (shared with one other), and Best for In-Person Service (shared with four others), and was ranked first in the following categories: trading technology; range of offerings (tied with one other firm); and customer service, education, and security. Overall ranking for both years based on unweighted ratings in the following categories: trading experience & technology; usability; mobile; range of offerings; research amenities; portfolio analysis and reports; customer service, education, and security; and costs.
	
    

          4. Investor's Business Daily® (IBD), January 2015, 2016 and 2017: Best Online Brokers Special Report. January 2015: Fidelity ranked in the top five in 9 out of 11 categories. Fidelity was named first in Research Tools, Investment Research, Portfolio Analysis and Reports, and Educational Resources. January 2016: Fidelity ranked in the top five in 10 out of 12 categories. Fidelity was named first in Trade Reliability, Research Tools, Investment Research, Portfolio Analysis and Reports, and Educational Resources. January 2017: Fidelity ranked in the top two in all 13 categories. Fidelity was named first in Research Tools, Portfolio Analysis and Reports, Investment Research, Educational Resources, and Planning Tools. Results in 2017 were based on having the highest Customer Experience Index within the categories composing the survey, as scored by more than 4,752 respondents in the survey conducted by Investor’s Business Daily’s polling partner, TechnoMetrica Market Intelligence. © Investor's Business Daily, Inc. All rights reserved.
	
    

          5. Kiplinger's, August 2016. Online Broker Survey. Fidelity was ranked No. 1 overall out of 7 online brokers. Results based on ratings in the following categories: Commissions and Fees, Breadth of Investment Choices, Tools, Research, Ease of Use, Mobile, and Advisory.
	
    

For iShares ETFs, Fidelity receives compensation from the ETF sponsor and/or its affiliates in connection with an exclusive long-term marketing program that includes promotion of iShares ETFs and inclusion of iShares funds in certain FBS platforms and investment programs. Additional information about the sources, amounts, and terms of compensation can be found in the ETF’s prospectus and related documents. Fidelity may add or waive commissions on ETFs without prior notice. BlackRock and iShares are registered trademarks of BlackRock Inc., and its affiliates.


          The initial customer ratings and reviews for this product (those dated before 6/21/2012) were provided to Fidelity through an email solicitation for feedback on the product. All ratings and reviews are provided to Fidelity on a voluntarily basis and are screened in accordance with the guidelines set forth in our Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use. For additional information on which ratings and reviews may be posted, please refer to our Customer Ratings and Review Terms of Use. Featured Reviews have been selected based on subjective criteria and reviewed by Fidelity Investments. The average rating is determined by calculating the mathematical average of all ratings that are approved for posting per the Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of use and does not include any ratings that did not meet the guidelines and were therefore not posted. Ratings and reviews are added continuously to the website (after a delay for screening against guidelines) and average ratings are updated dynamically as reviews are added or removed.


The ratings and experience of customers may not be representative of the experiences of all customers or investors and is not indicative of future success. The accuracy of information included in the customer ratings and reviews cannot be guaranteed by Fidelity Investments. Customers who post ratings may be responsible for disclosing whether they have a financial interest or conflict in submitting a rating and review.


Please contact a Fidelity representative if you have additional questions or concerns about the ratings and reviews posted here.
	
    

System availability and response times may be subject to market conditions.



Keep in mind that investing involves risk. The value of your investment will fluctuate over time, and you may gain or lose money.



Before investing, consider the funds' investment objectives, risks, charges, and expenses. Contact Fidelity for a prospectus or, if available, a summary prospectus containing this information. Read it carefully.



567977.53.0











Mutual Funds


ETFs


Fixed Income


Bonds


CDs


Options

Active Trader Pro



Stocks


Online Trading


Annuities


Life Insurance & Long Term Care

Small Business Retirement Plans



IRAs


Retirement Products


Retirement Planning


529 Plans

FINRA's BrokerCheck
Guest Access






Stay Connected 




			                Locate an Investor Center by ZIP Code
					








							 
							   Please enter a valid ZIP code
							
						  












Facebook





Twitter





LinkedIn





Google+





YouTube





Fidelity Mobile®













Careers


News Releases


About Fidelity


International






Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.


Terms of Use


Privacy


Security


Site Map

Accessibility

This is for persons in the U.S. only.









close




                                                        
                                                       
                                                           Trade With an Industry Leader
                                                        

                                           



















close





Retirement IRAs

Open a Rollover IRA






Open a Roth IRA










Open a Traditional IRA














Investing & Savings

Open a Brokerage Account






Open a Cash Management Account










Open Both Accounts

Open both a brokerage and cash management account to easily transfer and protect your funds.








See All Accounts


















 




Mobile Trading Apps for Smartphones from Fidelity














































Print
 Email


Email








Send to (Separate multiple email addresses with commas)


Please enter a valid email address


Your email address

Please enter a valid email address


Message (Optional)








Important legal information about the email you will be sending. By using this service, you agree to input your real email address and only send it to people you know. It is a violation of law in some jurisdictions to falsely identify yourself in an email. All information you provide will be used by Fidelity solely for the purpose of sending the email on your behalf. The subject line of the email you send will be "Fidelity.com: "




Email




Your email has been sent.


Share


Share





Mutual Funds and Mutual Fund Investing - Fidelity Investments
Clicking a link will open a new window.

Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Google+




Default text size A


Larger text size A


Largest text size A
 













                                                        
                                                       
                                                           Fidelity Mobile® Apps
                                                        

                                           

			Prefer to manage your portfolio on the go? Fidelity's mobile services and apps let you access your accounts whenever—and wherever—you want.

Open an Account








Next generation, industry-first functionality
 Apps for your smartphone, tablet, and more 








iPhone®

iPad®

Apple Watch®


Apple TV®

AndroidTM devices


Windows® Phone 8

Amazon Devices


















Mobile platform highlights*



Access your personalized Feed on our iPhone and Android apps

An industry-first, dynamic experience with timely and relevant portfolio, market, and research information, plus customized news and tailored content.



Monitor your portfolio

Check balances, transfer money, get intraday valuations, and keep track of the positions in your accounts.


Manage your workplace accounts

Review details of your Fidelity brokerage account, 401(k), 403(b), or other workplace investing accounts.


Trade anytime, anywhere

Trade stocks, options, ETFs, and mutual funds.
Access an enhanced option chain, multi-leg option trading, trading of specific shares for stocks or ETFs, tax lots for your positions, margin trades in your IRA, plus extended hours trading.
Get quotes from Fidelity on Echo—Amazon's voice response device. Simply ask Alexa, the voice of Echo, for a quote on your favorite securities.


Receive alerts and push notifications

Get timely, customizable alerts via push notification or in the Message Center.


Deposit checks

Make deposits 24/7 directly into the Fidelity account of your choice—it's convenient, safe, and easy.




Tax forms NEW

A unique, first-to-market offering


Personalized tax schedule—shows your available tax forms and when to expect additional forms


Pay bills

Receive a notification when your bills are available and pay on the go with most Fidelity accounts, including the Fidelity® Cash Management Account.


Contribute to your IRA

Use your mobile device to deposit money directly into your Roth or Traditional IRA.


Research and view the latest news

Get news and videos, view real-time quotes and charts, and set up watch lists to track your preferred securities.


Use Touch ID on your Apple device

Quickly and conveniently access your account information without needing to log in. Easily activate Touch ID within the app settings (on touch-enabled Apple devices with iOS 8).


Stay connected with your Apple Watch

See what's moving the markets with a markets Glance view, receive alerts, view real-time quotes, and more—all with just a twist of your wrist.


Keep tabs on the market with Apple TV

View current market data, watch Bloomberg TV, get quotes, and more—24/7, right from your TV.












 Mobile safe—mobile secure. 
Mobile trading at Fidelity keeps your financial and personal information secure—guaranteed.

Learn more about our mobile security




















Questions?


800-343-3548
800-343-3548











Check out our enhanced mobile check deposit (00:36)














*Not all features available on all platforms. For a list of available features please visit the mobile details page for your specific device.


          Data contained in these screenshots are for illustrative purposes only.
	
    

Options trading entails significant risk and is not appropriate for all investors. Certain complex options strategies carry additional risk. Before trading options, please read Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options. Supporting documentation for any claims, if applicable, will be furnished upon request.


System availability and response times may be subject to market conditions.


          Apple and Fidelity Investments are independent entities and are not legally affiliated.
	
    

          Third-party trademarks appearing herein are the property of their respective owners. All other trademarks are the property of FMR LLC.
	
    

          Apple, the Apple logo, iPad, iPhone, Apple Watch, and Apple TV are trademarks of Apple Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries. App Store is a service mark of Apple Inc.
	
    

          Android and Google Play are trademarks of Google Inc.
	
    

          Kindle Fire and Echo are trademarks of Amazon.
	
    

          Fidelity, Fidelity Investments, and the Pyramid design logo are registered service marks of FMR LLC.
	
    

          Fidelity Brokerage Services LLC, Member NYSE, SIPC, 900 Salem Street, Smithfield, RI 02917
	
    


577161.31.0











Mutual Funds


ETFs


Fixed Income


Bonds


CDs


Options

Active Trader Pro



Stocks


Online Trading


Annuities


Life Insurance & Long Term Care

Small Business Retirement Plans



IRAs


Retirement Products


Retirement Planning


529 Plans

FINRA's BrokerCheck
Guest Access






Stay Connected 




			                Locate an Investor Center by ZIP Code
					








							 
							   Please enter a valid ZIP code
							
						  












Facebook





Twitter





LinkedIn





Google+





YouTube





Fidelity Mobile®













Careers


News Releases


About Fidelity


International






Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.


Terms of Use


Privacy


Security


Site Map

Accessibility

This is for persons in the U.S. only.

















 




Active Trader Pro Platforms from Fidelity
















































Print
 Email


Email








Send to (Separate multiple email addresses with commas)


Please enter a valid email address


Your email address

Please enter a valid email address


Message (Optional)








Important legal information about the email you will be sending. By using this service, you agree to input your real email address and only send it to people you know. It is a violation of law in some jurisdictions to falsely identify yourself in an email. All information you provide will be used by Fidelity solely for the purpose of sending the email on your behalf. The subject line of the email you send will be "Fidelity.com: "




Email




Your email has been sent.


Share


Share





Mutual Funds and Mutual Fund Investing - Fidelity Investments
Clicking a link will open a new window.

Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Google+



 














Trading Overview














                                                        
                                                       
                                                           Active Trader Pro®


			Get more from your online trading and portfolio monitoring experience with a customizable desktop platform available for both the PC and Mac.
		














 
 
Reasons to consider ActiveTraderPro®



Streaming, customizable quotes and watch lists
Integrated access to positions, charts, news, alerts, and orders help identify entry and exit strategies
Real-time integrated balances, history, and positions with real-time tax lot detail





 
Get started



Download ActiveTraderPro® 
Available for PC and Mac
Want to try it out first? Download the demo (PC only) 









Expand all 


Collapse all 





Features


Streaming market data  


Streaming, customizable quotes and watch lists
Interactive charts with tabbed views, plus pattern and event recognition
Preset filters to track market movers, technical events and option activity, now with access to Custom Option Scan results
Advanced option analytics, including a Probability Calculator, Profit and Loss Calculator, Option Statistics, and Strategy Ideas
Integrated Time and Sales Tool with real-time and historical data for equities and options




Advanced trading  


Use Trade Armor® to trade equities, ETFs, and options with integrated access to Positions, Chart, News, Alerts, Orders, and Research.
Create and save up to 50 equity or option orders simultaneously. Place up to 20 orders at once with the multi-trade ticket.
Use conditional orders to create triggers for stock and option orders based on the price movement of stocks, indices, or options contracts.
Trade on unsettled funds and day-trade stocks and options in retirement accounts.
Leverage directed equity and options trading, including access to advanced algorithms.
View financing costs and share availability when selling short, hard to borrow securities.




Portfolio management tools  


Real-time integrated balances, history, and positions with real-time tax lot detail.
Options Summary with option positions by underlying, strategy, or expiration; margin requirements; and profit and loss information
Account Summary with intraday realized and unrealized gain/loss, balances, restrictions, and order information
Enhanced balances display, including cash available to trade without margin impact and daily mark to market




Customization and short cuts  


Preset and custom layouts
Fast order entry by clicking the bid or ask to prefill trade ticket
Advanced order status with quick cancel-and-replace interaction








Want Active Trader Pro®, but don’t have access?



Call us at 800-564-0211 and we'll gladly enable it for you.













Download Active Trader Pro® for PC
View system requirements










Download Active Trader Pro® for Mac
View system requirements










Additional resources



Active Trader Pro® FAQs
Ten features of the Active Trader Pro® (PDF)







016
5508atp











Questions?
Call a trading specialist.


800-564-0211
800-564-0211

Chat with a representative






Get 500 free trades
Earn up to 500 commission free trades, good for 2 years, and access to Active Trader Pro® when you open and fund a brokerage account or IRA.




More information



Making the most of Active Trader Pro®


Watch educational videos to learn more about the powerful tools and features available within Active Trader Pro®.



Active Investor eNewsletter

Sign up to receive news, offers, and events specifically geared toward Active Traders.



















          Sell orders are subject to an activity assessment fee (from $0.01 to $0.03 per $1,000 of principal). Trades are limited to online domestic equities and options and must be used within two years. Options trades are limited to 20 contracts per trade. Offer valid for new and existing Fidelity customers opening or adding net new assets to an eligible Fidelity IRA or brokerage account. Deposits of $50,000-$99,999 will receive 300 free trades, and deposits of $100,000 or more will receive 500 free trades. Account balance of $50,000 of net new assets must be maintained for at least nine months; otherwise, normal commission schedule rates may be retroactively applied to any free trade executions. See Fidelity.com/ATP500free for further details and full offer terms. Fidelity reserves the right to modify these terms and conditions or terminate this offer at any time. Other terms and conditions, or eligibility criteria may apply.
	
    

          Active Trader Pro® is automatically made available to customers trading 36 times or more in a rolling 12-month period. If you do not meet the eligibility criteria, please contact Active Trader Services at 1-800-564-0211 to request access.
	
    

Options trading entails significant risk and is not appropriate for all investors. Certain complex options strategies carry additional risk. Before trading options, please read Characteristics and Risks of Standardized Options. Supporting documentation for any claims, if applicable, will be furnished upon request.


National Financial Services is the executing broker-dealer for directed trading orders.


System availability and response times may be subject to market conditions.


          The initial customer ratings and reviews for this product (those dated before 11/17/2014) were provided to Fidelity through an email solicitation for feedback on the product. All ratings and reviews are provided to Fidelity on a voluntary basis and are screened in accordance with the guidelines set forth in our Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use. For additional information on which ratings and reviews may be posted, please refer to our Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use. Featured reviews have been selected based on subjective criteria and have been reviewed by Fidelity Investments. The average rating is determined by calculating the mathematical average of all ratings that are approved for posting per the Customer Ratings and Reviews Terms of Use, and does not include any ratings that did not meet the guidelines and were therefore not posted). Ratings and reviews are added continuously to the Web site (after a delay for screening against guidelines), and average ratings are updated dynamically as reviews are added or removed.


          The ratings and experiences of customers may not be representative of the experiences of all customers or investors and are not indicative of future success. The accuracy of information included in the customer ratings and reviews cannot be guaranteed by Fidelity Investments. Customers who post ratings may be responsible for disclosing whether they have a financial interest or conflict in submitting a rating or review.
	
    

          Please contact a Fidelity representative if you have any questions or concerns about the ratings and reviews posted here.
	
    

          Reviews displayed were solicited for Active Trader Pro® version 10.2 and ActiveTraderPro.com® version 10 and above.
	
    


557109.33.0










Mutual Funds


ETFs


Fixed Income


Bonds


CDs


Options

Active Trader Pro



Stocks


Online Trading


Annuities


Life Insurance & Long Term Care

Small Business Retirement Plans



IRAs


Retirement Products


Retirement Planning


529 Plans

FINRA's BrokerCheck
Guest Access






Stay Connected 




			                Locate an Investor Center by ZIP Code
					








							 
							   Please enter a valid ZIP code
							
						  












Facebook





Twitter





LinkedIn





Google+





YouTube





Fidelity Mobile®













Careers


News Releases


About Fidelity


International






Copyright 1998-2017 FMR LLC. All Rights Reserved.


Terms of Use


Privacy


Security


Site Map

Accessibility

This is for persons in the U.S. only.


















 






global investment trusts - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










Templeton Foreign Fund - Highly-Rated Equity Fund



Ad
 ·
www.franklintempleton.com



A proven track record of finding value around the world. See results.





Fund Performance



Fund Overview




Fund Portfolio





Janus Henderson ETF - SG Global Quality Income-SGQI



Ad
 ·
en-us.janushenderson.com/​SGQI



Learn how SGQI seeks to access quality, high-yielding global equities.




1031 Exchanges Secure Wealth - DST Properties Give You Time



Ad
 ·
www.kingsbarn.com/​1031/​exchanges



Passive Income that's management-free, giving you more time for important things





DST Offering(s)



Passive Invesments



NNN Properties





U.S. Trust® - Official Site - Investment Management



Ad
 ·
www.ustrust.com/​Investment/​Management



Our Professionals Have Valuable Expertise In A Broad Spectrum Financial Assets.





Articles By U.S. Trust



Finance & Liquidity



Wealth Structuring





Searches related toglobal investment trusts



northern trust global investments


global trust investment company llc


templeton global investment trust


global trust investment bank



multi manager global investment trust


northern trust global investments lim...


swiss global investment trust ag




Web Results

Global - Sector Profile | FE Trustnet - Investment trusts

https://www.trustnet.com/Investments/SectorProfile.aspx?code=T:IG&...


FE Trustnet, Free daily updated analysis and price / performance data on all UK Unit Trusts, OEICs, Investment Trusts, Pension, Insurance Bond and Offshore Funds ...


Investors Chronicle - Best global investment trusts

www.investorschronicle.co.uk/2014/10/22/funds-and-etfs/investment...


Global investment trusts can be a useful portfolio holding for many types of investor. We find the best options.


Top Global Equity Investment Trusts | Morningstar

www.morningstar.co.uk/.../top-global-equity-investment-trusts.aspx


Want to leave stock selection to the experts this year? These are the top rated trusts that invest in companies from across the world, bringing you global...


Investment Trust League Tables - Global Growth | Wealth ...

citywire.co.uk/wealth_manager/investment-trusts/best-investment...


Investment Trust - Global Growth. Sponsored by: Period: 3 years: 11/07/2014 to 11/07/2017 Show Investment trust . over ...


Our Global Investment Trusts | F&C Asset Management

www.fandc.com/uk/private-investors/investment-trusts/global-trusts


There are so investment opportunities it can be hard to decide which will give you the best potential returns - global portfolio gives you a great overview


Home | WhichInvestmentTrust.com

https://whichinvestmenttrust.com


Henderson Global Trust ... (or try to) about investment trusts and about how to invest. ... whichinvestmenttrust.com/why-i ...


Investment Trusts │ Our range │BlackRock UK

https://www.blackrock.com/uk/individual/products/investment-trusts/...


BlackRock's range of 11 investment trusts covers carefully selected companies from around the world, spanning European and emerging market shares, small caps and mining.


Investment trusts - Private Investor - Schroders

www.schroders.com/.../fund-centre/funds-in-focus/investment-trusts


Investment trusts Investment trusts. ... When people invest, what are their hopes and expectations? Schroders Global Investor Study looks at the investment goals, ...


The 20 best-performing investment trusts over the last ...

www.thisismoney.co.uk/...2321354/...investment-trusts-decade.html


The Association of Investment Companies has analysed all investment trusts to find the 20 strongest and most consistent performers of the last decade.


Allianz Global Investors | Investment Trusts

https://uk.allianzgi.com/guide-to-investing/investment-trusts


Allianz Global Investors and its predecessors have been managing investment trusts since 1889, providing investors with access to investment opportunities around the ...










Templeton Foreign Fund - Highly-Rated Equity Fund



Ad
 ·
www.franklintempleton.com



A proven track record of finding value around the world. See results.





Fund Performance



Fund Overview




Fund Portfolio





Janus Henderson ETF - SG Global Quality Income-SGQI



Ad
 ·
en-us.janushenderson.com/​SGQI



Learn how SGQI seeks to access quality, high-yielding global equities.




1031 Exchanges Secure Wealth - DST Properties Give You Time



Ad
 ·
www.kingsbarn.com/​1031/​exchanges



Passive Income that's management-free, giving you more time for important things





DST Offering(s)



Passive Invesments



NNN Properties





U.S. Trust® - Official Site - Investment Management



Ad
 ·
www.ustrust.com/​Investment/​Management



Our Professionals Have Valuable Expertise In A Broad Spectrum Financial Assets.





Articles By U.S. Trust



Finance & Liquidity



Wealth Structuring




Searches related toglobal investment trusts



northern trust global investments


global trust investment company llc


templeton global investment trust


global trust investment bank



multi manager global investment trust


northern trust global investments lim...


swiss global investment trust ag




12345Next






Answers







Witan Investment Trust



Witan Investment Trust plc (Witan) a multi-managed, global equity investment trust, with a portfolio diversified by geographical region, industrial sector

more






Australian real estate investment trust



€72 billion, accounting for 9.36% of the global real estate investment trust (REIT) market capitalization. The current top five A-REIT managers are...

more






Scottish Mortgage Investment Trust



Scottish Mortgage Investment Trust is a publicly traded investment trust. It invests globally, looking for strong businesses with above-average...

more










global investment trusts News






Gov. touts global investment



Batesville Daily Guard -...

 - Jul 19


Become an online subscriber Thousands of readers outside the Batesville area will no longer have to wait for mail delivery to read the Batesville Daily Guard.  You're just a point and a click away...

more





Asa Hutchinson Touts Global Investment in Arkansas



Government & Politics -...

 - Jul 19


NORTH LITTLE ROCK — Arkansas' governor is promoting the state as a welcoming place for foreign companies to invest, joining at least three other states that have issued similar policy statements...

more





Comcast And Liberty Global Invest In Integrate's Demand MarTech



All Articles on Seeking Alpha

 - Jul 21


Quick Take Media giants Comcast (NASDAQ:CMCSA) and Liberty Global (LBTYA) have participated in the latest financing round of $8 million for marketing technology company Integrate. Integrate has...

more



















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network












American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds









































American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds









































American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds









































American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds





































